Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Additive” means an increase in the pace, scale and quality of forest, rangeland and
water restoration services on  federal lands within Oregon, including but not limited to ser-
vices to produce  timber harvest volumes that exceed outputs that would be produced by
federal land management agencies alone.
(b) “Federal land management agencies” means the United States Forest Service and the
Bureau of Land Management.
(c) “Forest, rangeland and water restoration services” means activities that:
(A) Treat insect-infested or disease-infected trees;
(B) Reduce hazardous fuels; or
(C) Restore or improve forest,  rangeland or watershed health, including but not limited
to fish or wildlife habitat health.
(d) “Good Neighbor Authority Agreement” means the Good Neighbor Authority Agree-
ment that the Governor, the State Forester and the State Fish and Wildlife  Director entered
into with the United States Forest Service on March 29, 2016.
(2) It is the policy of the state to pursue projects under the Good Neighbor Authority
Agreement that increase timber harvest volume, contribute to job creation,  reduce wildfire
risks to all lands, improve wildlife habitat and watershed health and  stimulate local econo-
mies. To the extent allowed by the agreement, state agencies that are signatories  to the
agreement shall work with federal  land management agencies to give priority to projects
that:
(a) Consist of additive activities;
(b) Maximize economic benefit to this state; and
(c) Recover the state agency costs of implementing the projects.
SECTION 2.
The Governor and the Federal Forest Working Group  of Oregon Solutions
at Portland State University shall jointly develop specific  recommendations regarding goals
for the Good Neighbor Authority Agreement as  defined in section 1 of this 2018 Act. The
Governor, or a  state agency described in section 1 (2) of this 2018 Act designated by the
Governor, shall report the recommendations to the Legislative  Assembly in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245 no later than March 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 4118 (HB 4118-B) Page 1
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $500,000, which may  be expended by the department for the
purpose of supporting the  development, planning or implementation of projects on federal
lands to  which the signatory state agencies working with federal land management agencies
under section 1 of this 2018 Act give priority under section 1 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4118 (HB 4118-B) Page 2